src/noun-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON FirstComponent
!økologïske:økologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!økonomïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:økonomïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!økumenïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:økumenïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!ïrske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ïrsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!Theese are adjectives which should be here in the nounfile as substantives- will 
!troké
!trojansk= som hører til, er egen for Troja ell. trojanerne; troisk; den trojanske krig 
!trigonometri
!zairïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:zairïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!zambïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:zambïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!zanzibarïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:zanzibarïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!zoologïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:zoologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!zootomïske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:zootomïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!yemenitihke:yemenittïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!vokalisk
!trans^atlanihke:trans^atlantïsk e-e-EVEN-1 ; 
!topo^grafïske:topo^grafïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!togolesïske:togolesïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!togolesïske:togolesïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!tibetansk
!terminologïske:terminologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!termo^plasihke:termo^plastïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!termïske:termïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!1teutåanske:teutåansk e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!terapeuihke:terapeutïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
! tekno^kraihke:tekno^kratïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!teknologïske:teknologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!teknïske:teknïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!telefonïske:telefonïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!tele^grafïske:tele^grafïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!telepaihke:telepatïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!temaihke:tematïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!teologïske:teologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!teoreihke:teoretïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!tautologïske:tautologïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!tchadïske:tchadïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!tanzanïske:tanzanïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!te^atralske:te^atralske e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!takihke:taktïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!taiwanske:taiwanske e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!syrïske:syrïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!systemaihke:systematïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!symfonïske:symfonïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!symmetrïske:symmetrïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!sympaihke:sympatïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!symptomaihke:symptomatïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!syn^kronïske:syn^kronïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!syntagmasihke:syntagmastïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!syntakihke:syntaktïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!synteihke:syntetïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!sveitsïske:sveitsïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!svermerïske:svermerïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!summarïske:summarïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!supersonïske:supersonïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!surinaamske:surinaamsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!surre^alisihke:surre^alistïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!sudanske:sudanske e-es-EVEN-2 ;
!subsonïske:subsonïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
!sub^tropïske:sub^tropïsk e-es-EVEN-2 ; 

arovme:arovm NIEJTE ; 
aajkohke+CmpN/SgN:aajkohk R ;
aehtjie+CmpN/SgN:aehtj R ;
bæjngolds+CmpN/SgN:bæjngolds R ;
dåarehtje+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN:dåarehtje R ;
iehkede+CmpN/SgN:iehkeds R ;
jåvle+CmpN/SgN:jåvle R ;
jåvlh+CmpN/SgN:jåvlh R ;
luhkie+CmpN/SgN:luhkie R ;
maadter+CmpN/SgN:maadter R ;
maake+CmpN/SgN:maake R ;
skïemtje+CmpN/SgN:skïemtje R ;
tjidtjie+CmpN/SgN:tjidtj R ;
tsåelhkie+CmpN/SgN:tsåelhkie R ;
veete+CmpN/SgN:veete R ;
vuentiemie+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN:vuentiemie R ;
åarjel+CmpN/SgN:åarjel R ;
buaredh+CmpN/SgN:buareds R ;
iehkede+CmpN/SgN:eahkeds R ;
aerede+CmpN/SgN:aereds R ;
biejjie+CmpN/SgN:biejjh R ;
beetnege+CmpN/SgN:beetneh R ;
dïeve+CmpN/SgN:dïev R ;
doenehke+CmpN/SgN:doen R ;	
gaalve+CmpN/SgN:gaalv R ;
goese+CmpN/SgN:goes R ;
gosse+CmpN/SgN:goss R ;	 
gusnie+CmpN/SgN:gusn R ; 
gåetie+CmpN/SgN:gået R ;	
hovre+CmpN/SgN:hovr R ;	
håagke+CmpN/SgN:håagk R ;
jarhpe+CmpN/SgN:jarhp R ;
jolle+CmpN/SgN:joll R ;
kriste+CmpN/SgN:krist R ;
mïetske+CmpN/SgN:mïetsk R ;
naemie+CmpN/SgN:naem R ;
nïejhte+CmpN/SgN:nïejht R ;
ohtjenjidtjie+CmpN/SgN:ohtjenjidtj R ; 
orre+CmpN/SgN:orr R ;
rijte+CmpN/SgN:rijt R ;	! dat lea somá! mii dat nomen lea? boahtá rijtedh, jáhkán
roeste+CmpN/SgN:roest R ; 
ruaksja+CmpN/SgN:ruaksj R; 
soehpenje+CmpN/SgN:soehpenj R ;
soene+CmpN/SgN:soen R ;
tjelmie+CmpN/SgN:tjelm R ;
	
